Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201871-253
Mobile barber shop license; revocation or expiration; effect.

The license of a mobile barber shop that has been revoked or expired for any reason shall not be reinstated. An original application for licensure shall be submitted and approved before such barber shop may reopen for business.

Laws 2018, LB731, § 88.
January 1, 2019